Connecticut, session 2026, HB05334.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) The Commissioner of Energy
and Environmental Protection shall utilize any state funds made
available to the Department of Energy and Environmental Protection,
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for the purpose of the
preservation of riparian areas to hire an employee to conduct training
for inland wetland commissions on matters pertaining to the Inland
Wetlands and Watercourses Act, including, but not limited to, the
preservation of riparian areas.
Governor's Action:
Approved May 20, 2026